Hawaii statutes.
§171-94 Persons dispossessed or displaced.
For the purposes of this part, a person dispossessed or displaced by natural
disaster means any owner of land in possession or any lessee or tenant of land
in possession, who has used the property for residential purposes immediately
prior to the date the property was substantially destroyed by or as a result of
a natural disaster or was made unfit for such purposes by or as a result of any
urban redevelopment project which resulted from a natural disaster. Property
shall be deemed unfit for residence purposes when so determined by the board of
land and natural resources, which determination shall be final, or if any law,
ordinance, or regulation of any governmental agency prohibits the construction
of improvements on land in a disaster area. [L 1962, c 32, pt of §2; am L 1963,
c 177, §1; Supp, §103A-89; HRS §171-94]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next